Hawaii statutes.
§431:10-206 Application for insurance:
consent of insured required. No life insurance or accident and health or
sickness insurance contract upon an individual shall be made or effectuated
unless at the time of the making of the contract the individual insured, being
of competent legal capacity to contract, applies for or consents to the
insurance in writing, except in the following cases:

(1) A spouse may effectuate such insurance upon the
other spouse.

(2) Any person having an insurable interest in the
life of a minor, or any person upon whom a minor is dependent for support and
maintenance, may effectuate insurance upon the life of or pertaining to the
minor.

This section shall not apply to contracts of group
life insurance or of group or blanket disability insurance as defined in this
code. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2; am L 2002, c 155, §41]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next